Utah statutes.
39-1-25.   Property and fiscal officer of the United States for Utah.
The governor shall designate an officer of the National Guard, subject to the
approval of the Department of the Army or the Department of the Air Force, as
property and fiscal officer of the United States for Utah. Such officer shall
have had actual service in the forces of the United States or the National
Guard, and have knowledge of army or air administration. Such officer shall
receive and account for all funds and property belonging to the United States
in the possession of the National Guard, and shall make such returns and
reports concerning the same as may be required by the National Guard Bureau.
Such officer shall render, through the National Guard Bureau, such accounts of
federal funds entrusted to him for disbursement as may be required by the
Treasury Department. Before entering upon the performance of his duties as
property and disbursing officer he shall be required to give good and
substantial bond to the United States, the amount thereof to be determined by
the National Guard Bureau, for the faithful performance of his duties, for the
safekeeping and proper disbursing of the federal property and funds entrusted
to his care.
